Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department, in collaboration with
the Oregon Health Authority, shall disburse moneys in the  Housing for Mental Health Fund
to provide funding for:
(a) The development of community-based housing,  including licensed residential treat-
ment facilities, for individuals with mental illness and individuals with  substance use disor-
ders; and
(b) Crisis intervention services, rental subsidies and  other housing-related services to
help keep individuals with mental illness  and individuals with substance use disorders safe
and healthy in their communities.
(2) The department shall provide funding for:
(a) A portion of the costs to  purchase land and to construct housing described in sub-
section (1)(a) of this section; and
(b) Up to 50 percent of the  start-up costs for providing housing described in subsection
(1)(a) of this section, including but not limited to fixtures, furnishings and training of staff.
(3)(a) The department shall prescribe the financing mechanisms to be used  to provide
funding under subsection (2)(a) of this section of up to 35 percent of  the total project devel-
opment costs.
(b) The department may waive the 35 percent limit on total project  development costs
under paragraph (a) of this subsection for  a low-cost project or to meet a critical need in a
rural area.
(4) The department shall convene an advisory  group to make recommendations to the
department for:
(a) The allocation of moneys between different types of housing;
(b) The financing of housing described in subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(c) The provision of services described in subsection (1)(b) of this section;
(d) Soliciting funding proposals; and
(e) Processing applications for funding.
(5) The advisory group convened under subsection (4) of this section must include:
(a) One representative of a private provider of mental health treatment;
Enrolled House Bill 3063 (HB 3063-B) Page 1
(b) One representative of a private provider of substance abuse treatment;
(c) Two representatives  of groups that advocate on behalf of consumers of mental health
or substance abuse treatment;
(d) One staff person from the department;
(e) One staff person from the  division of the Oregon Health Authority that regulates
mental health and substance abuse treatment programs;
(f) Two consumers of mental health or substance abuse treatment;
(g) One representative of a community mental health program;
(h) One person with expertise in developing and financing community housing projects
in rural communities; and
(i) One representative of community corrections.
SECTION 2.
 Section 9, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) The Housing for Mental Health Fund is established in the State  Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. The Housing for Mental  Health Fund consists of moneys de-
posited in the fund  under section 8 , [ of this 2015 Act ] chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015,  and may
include moneys  appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Housing and Community Services
Department for disbursement for the purposes set forth in [ section 8 of this 2015 Act ] section  1 of
this 2017 Act .
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3063 (HB 3063-B) Page 2